Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 7
ETHICS IN GOVERNMENT

Sec.

§ 59-701. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-401.

§ 59-702. Policy and purpose. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-402.

§ 59-703. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-403.

§ 59-704. Required action in conflicts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-404.

§ 59-704A. Noncompensated public official

Exception. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-405.

§ 59-705. Civil penalty. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 140, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 74-406.

§ 59-706. Allowance of claims of ineligibles. [Repealed.]